South Dakota, session 2026, HB1140.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 23A-27-18.3 be AMENDED:
23A-27-18.3. The conditions of probation imposed pursuant to § 23A-27-12 or
23A-27-13, or the conditions of a suspension of execution imposed pursuant to § 23A-27-
18, shall provide, in addition to any other conditions and as an explicit condition of
probation, suspended imposition of sentence, or suspended execution of sentence, that
the defendant not commit another federal, state, or local crime during the term of
probation or suspension.
The conditions of probation imposed pursuant to § 23A-27-12 or 23A-27-13, or the
conditions of a suspension of execution imposed pursuant to § 23A-27-18, may provide,
in addition to any other conditions and as an explicit condition of probation, suspended
imposition of sentence, or suspended execution of sentence, that the defendant:
(1) Pay a fine or perform community service work as directed by the court;
(2) Participate in and complete a program at any nonprofit entity awarded an
alternative care program grant pursuant to § 16-2-60, if:
(a) The defendant consents to participating in the program;
(b) The program has availability and the defendant's application is approved
based on the standard criteria for all applicants; and
(c) The defendant's application is completed prior to sentencing;
(3) Receive treatment for chemical dependency at any South Dakota treatment facility
accredited pursuant to § 34-20A-27 and reimburse the county for costs of
treatment ordered by the court; or
(4) Make restitution pursuant to the provisions of chapter 23A-28.

26.175.18 2 1140
Section 2. That § 32-23-4 be AMENDED:
32-23-4. If conviction for a violation of § 32-23-1 is for a third offense, the person
is guilty of a Class 6 felony, and the court must revoke the person's driver license for a
period of not less than one year from the date sentence is imposed or one year from the
date of initial release from imprisonment, whichever is later. If the person is returned to
imprisonment prior to the completion of the period of driver's license revocation, time
spent imprisoned does not count toward fulfilling the period of revocation. If the person is
convicted of driving without a license during that period, the court must sentence the
person to the county jail for not less than ten days, which sentence may not be suspended.
Notwithstanding § 23A-27-19, the court retains jurisdiction to modify the conditions of the
license revocation for the term of the revocation. Upon the successful completion of a
court-approved chemical dependency counseling program, and proof of financial
responsibility pursuant to § 32-35-113, the court may permit the person to operate a
vehicle for the purposes of employment, 24/7 sobriety testing, attendance at school, child
care delivery or pickup, health appointments, attendance at court or probation
appointments, or attendance at counseling programs, treatment, aftercare, or an
alternative care program pursuant to subdivision 23A-27-18.3(2).
HB1140 ENROLLED

26.175.18 3 1140
An Act to permit a court to impose as a condition of probation, or parole in certain
circumstances, treatment at a nonprofit entity awarded an alternative care program grant.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1140
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1140 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1140 ENROLLED